District of Columbia statutes.
47-1446

Repealed

Maintenance of place of business; nonresidents.

Repealed.

July 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-91, § 406, 24 DCR 9765
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 35(b)(3), 30 DCR 390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254,§ 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 59(c), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(a), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1446.
1973 Ed., § 47-3321.